Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-484
Game breeding and controlled shooting area; license; application; fee.

Any person or persons owning, holding, or controlling by lease or otherwise, which possession must be for a term of five or more years, any tract or tracts of land having an area of not less than eighty acres and not more than two thousand five hundred sixty acres who desires to establish a game breeding and controlled shooting area to propagate, preserve, and shoot game birds under the regulations as provided in sections 37-484 to 37-496 shall make application to the commission for a license as provided by such sections. Such application shall be made under oath of the applicant or one of its principal officers if the applicant is an association, club, or corporation and shall be accompanied by a license fee of not more than two hundred fifty-eight dollars, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. Any controlled shooting area existing on February 18, 1987, shall continue in operation on the existing acreage until such controlled shooting area license is not renewed or canceled. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security number.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 1, p. 492;

Laws 1967, c. 223, § 1, p. 598;

Laws 1969, c. 297, § 1, p. 1070;

Laws 1987, LB 206, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 29;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 93;

R.S.Supp.,1997, § 37-901;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 194;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 13;

Laws 2008, LB1162, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 16;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 16;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 18.
July 18, 2026